New Jersey, session 222, A4251.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Banking and Insurance shall establish by regulation a procedure for the payment of medical costs to eligible individuals injured as a result of an automobile accident in which: (1)   the automobile was stolen at the time of the accident; and (2)   the medical costs to treat the injuries of the eligible individual are not covered by the eligible individuals health insurance policy or automobile insurance policy, if any. b.    The procedures established by the department shall include, but not be limited to, the process for eligible individuals to apply for payment pursuant to this act and the criteria by which the commissioner shall determine the value of the payment provided to each eligible applicant. c.     The department shall issue payments from the Automobile Accident Injury Fund pursuant to this act without regard to whether the stolen automobile was adequately insured pursuant to the laws of this State. 2.    There is established a non-lapsing, revolving fund in the Department of Banking and Insurance to be known as the "Automobile Accident Injury Fund.  This fund shall be the repository for moneys otherwise appropriated or directed to be remitted to this fund as are necessary to implement this act.  The purpose of the fund shall be to cover the medical costs of an eligible individual injured as a result of an automobile accident in which the automobile was stolen at the time of the accident and the medical costs of the injured individual are not covered by the individuals health insurance policy or automobile insurance policy, if any, pursuant to section 1 of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 180th day next following the date of enactment.